src/fst/affixes/acronyms.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! !!!North Saami acronyms - affix part

!! !!The lexica giving tags and suffixes to the acronyms

LEXICON ACRONOUN_cons  
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 ACRONOUN ;

LEXICON ACRONOUN_vow  
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 ACRONOUN ;


LEXICON ACRONOUN   !!= * __@CODE@__ is the lexicon for __nouns__ (not +Prop) like ATV
 +N+ACR: acroconnector ;    
 
LEXICON UNIT   !!= * __@CODE@__  As acro, but without paradigm
+N+ABBR: ENDLEX ;

! These lexica are here because of the common file.
LEXICON ACRO_ACCRA
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
LEXICON ACRO_BERN
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
LEXICON ACRO_LONDON
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;
LEXICON ACRO_NYSTØ
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
+N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;

LEXICON ACRO_cons 
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 ACRO ;    

LEXICON ACRO_vow 
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 ACRO ;    


LEXICON ACRO 
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 +N+Prop+ACR: acroconnector ;    

LEXICON DYN_ACRO_cons 
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 DYN_ACRO ;    

LEXICON DYN_ACRO_vow 
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 DYN_ACRO ;    

LEXICON DYN_ACRO
!!= __@LEXNAME@__ 
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR+Dyn: acroconnector ;
 
LEXICON acroconnector   !!= * __@CODE@__ Here comes a set of possible symbols to
                        !! put between the abbreviation and its suffix
   acronull    ;
   R-          ; ! Here we dive over to the compounds: NRK-2, NRK-bargi

LEXICON acronull   !!= * __@CODE@__  for suffixless forms, redirecting to K_only for clitic forms

+Nom: # ;
+Acc: # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
